Louisiana, session 2026, HB1226.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1464.2 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1464.2. Insurance consumer transparency dashboard
A. As used in this Section, the following terms have the following meanings:
(1) "Covered lines" means homeowners' insurance and private passenger
automobile insurance.
(2) "Dashboard" means the publicly accessible online platform required by
this Section.
(3) "Department" means the Louisiana Department of Insurance.
(4) "Insurer" means any authorized insurer writing property or casualty
insurance in this state.
B. The department shall develop, implement, and maintain a publicly
accessible online insurance transparency dashboard. The dashboard shall be made
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2299 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1226
available on the department's official website at no cost to the public. The dashboard
shall be searchable by geographic area, including but not limited to ZIP code and
parish. Information presented on the dashboard shall be displayed in a format that
is easily understandable to a reasonable consumer.
C. The dashboard shall include, at a minimum, aggregated data for covered
lines of insurance as follows:
(1) The average written premium by ZIP code and parish.
(2) The percentage change in premiums on an annual basis and over a
three-year period.
(3) The number of insurers actively writing policies within each geographic
area.
(4) The total number of policies in force.
(5) The number and percentage of policies that are newly issued,
nonrenewed, and canceled.
(6) Identification of insurers writing policies within each geographic area,
provided such identification does not disclose proprietary or confidential
information.
(7) General explanatory information describing factors that may influence
insurance rates, including but not limited to catastrophe risk, reinsurance costs, and
claims trends.
D. Each insurer writing covered lines in this state shall submit to the
department all data necessary to comply with this Section. To the extent practicable,
the department shall utilize existing filings and regulatory data to avoid duplicative
reporting. The reporting intervals set forth by the department pursuant to this
Section shall not occur more frequently than once every six months.
E. The department shall ensure that the dashboard discloses no personally
identifiable information, shall not publish proprietary or trade secret information, and
shall present all data in an aggregated form sufficient to protect confidentiality.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2299 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1226
F. The department may promulgate rules and regulations in accordance with
the Administrative Procedure Act to implement the provisions of this Section.
Section 2. The department shall implement an initial version of the dashboard within
twelve months after the effective date of this Act, and full implementation shall be
completed within twenty-four months thereafter.